Washington statutes.
RCW 19.390.050

Requests for additional information.

The attorney general shall make any requests for additional information from the parties under RCW 19.86.110 within thirty days of the date notice is received under RCW 19.390.030 and 19.390.040. Nothing in this section precludes the attorney general from conducting an investigation or enforcing state or federal antitrust laws at a later date.

[ 2019 c 267 s 5.]